Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Agri-tourism activity” means an activity that is conducted by a  farm operation
to promote the farm operation, visitors  to a farm store and the sale of farm store products
to the public and  that may also generate commercial, entertainment or educational value.
Such activities may include:
(i) Farm tours;
(ii) Educational exhibits or classes;
(iii) Crop mazes;
(iv) Play structures;
(v) Farm-to-table meals;
(vi) Animal petting and feeding exhibits;
(vii) Hay or tractor rides; or
(viii) Other seasonal or holiday events.
(B) “Agri-tourism activity” does not include using a farm store for lodging  or as a
dwelling.
(b) “Farm-to-table meal” means  a meal offered as part of a fee-based dining experience,
where food grown by a farm operation or farmers in a  local agricultural area is prepared and
served in a manner that educates the public about  agricultural production or on-site sourc-
ing.
(c) “Farm unit” means a farm operation comprising all  parcels being farmed by a single
operation, whether the operation owns or leases the parcels.
(d) “Farm use” means, notwithstanding ORS 215.010,  only those activities listed under
ORS 215.203 (2)(a) undertaken for the primary purpose of obtaining a profit.
(e) “Local agricultural area” means Oregon or an  adjacent county in California, Idaho,
Nevada or Washington that borders an Oregon county in which a farm store is located.
(f) “Processed farm product” means  a farm product that has been transformed into a
manufactured product through methods such as cooking,  baking, heating, drying, mixing,
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 1
grinding, churning, separating, extracting, cutting, butchering or  freezing and has been
packaged or canned for human or animal use.
(2) A farm store may be established as a permitted use on land zoned  for exclusive farm
use under ORS 215.213 (1) and 215.283 (1), or on land zoned for mixed farm and forest  use,
if:
(a) The farm store is used for the sale of farm products produced by the farm  operation
that operates the farm store;
(b) No more than 10,000 square feet of one or more  permanently enclosed structures are
used for the farm store uses listed in subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) The farm store is situated on a tract of:
(A) At least 80 acres with at least 45 acres employed for farm use;
(B) Less than 80 acres but  at least 40 acres and with at least 25 acres employed for farm
use;
(C) Less than 40 acres but at least  20 acres and with at least 15 acres employed for farm
use; or
(D) Less than 20 acres if:
(i) At least 10 acres are employed for farm use; or
(ii) The farm store operates as part of a farm unit that has earned  at least $10,000 in
gross farm income cumulatively over the preceding two years.
(3) Farm stores may be used for:
(a) The sale of the farm products  or processed farm products produced in the local ag-
ricultural area;
(b) The sale of other  retail items, if displayed in an area not to exceed 25 percent of the
floor area of the permanent enclosed farm store structures;
(c) The sale of beverages and prepared food  items that are cooked or otherwise made
ready for immediate consumption; or
(d) Agri-tourism activities.
(4) The sale of retail items under subsection (3)(b)  of this section must take place within
a permanent  enclosed structure. All other allowable farm store uses may take place outside
or in temporary or unenclosed structures.
(5) In conjunction with an agri-tourism activity, a farm store  may use temporary struc-
tures or mobile vending units.
(6) A farm store may include on-site kitchen facilities licensed  by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 624.010  to 624.121. Food and beverages prepared under subsection (3)(c)
of this section may not be served in  a manner that causes the kitchen facilities to function
as a cafe or drive-through dining establishment.
(7)(a) A local government with land use jurisdiction over the site of  a farm store may
adopt siting standards for farm stores related to:
(A) Access, egress and parking;
(B) Traffic management;
(C) Noise management;
(D) Hours of event operation; or
(E) Sanitation and solid waste.
(b) A county may not apply siting standards  in a manner that prohibits the siting and
operation of a farm store under this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 215.213 is amended to read:
215.213. (1) In counties that have adopted marginal lands  provisions under ORS 197.247 (1991
Edition), the following uses may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) Churches and cemeteries in conjunction with churches.
(b) The propagation or harvesting of a forest product.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 2
(c) Utility facilities necessary for public service, not  including commercial facilities for the
purpose of generating electrical power  for public use by sale or transmission towers over 200 feet
in height, but including:
(A) Utility facilities as provided in ORS 215.275;
(B) Utility facilities that are associated transmission lines, as defined in ORS  215.274 and
469.300;
(C) Wetland waste treatment systems; or
(D) Facilities and service lines needed to  provide water or wastewater services allowed under
ORS 215.256.
(d) A dwelling on real property used for farm use if the dwelling is occupied by a  relative of the
farm operator or the farm  operator’s spouse, which means a child, parent, stepparent, grandchild,
grandparent, stepgrandparent, sibling, stepsibling, niece, nephew or first cousin of either,  if the farm
operator does or will require the assistance of the relative in  the management of the farm use and
the dwelling is located on the same lot or parcel as the dwelling of the farm  operator.
Notwithstanding ORS 92.010 to 92.192 or the minimum lot or parcel size requirements under ORS
215.780, if the owner  of a dwelling described in this paragraph obtains construction financing or
other financing secured by the dwelling and the secured party forecloses  on the dwelling, the se-
cured party may also foreclose on the homesite, as defined  in ORS 308A.250, and the foreclosure
shall operate as a partition of the homesite to create a new parcel.
(e) Nonresidential buildings customarily provided in conjunction with farm use.
(f) Subject to ORS 215.279, primary or  accessory dwellings customarily provided in conjunction
with farm use. For a primary dwelling, the dwelling must be on  a lot or parcel that is managed as
part of  a farm operation and is not smaller than the minimum lot size in a farm zone with a mini-
mum lot size acknowledged under ORS 197.251.
(g) Operations for the exploration for and production  of geothermal resources as defined by ORS
522.005 and oil and gas as defined by ORS 520.005, including the placement  and operation of
compressors, separators and other customary production equipment for an individual well adjacent
to the wellhead. Any activities or construction relating to such operations shall not be a  basis for
an exception under ORS 197.732 (2)(a) or (b).
(h) Operations for  the exploration for minerals as defined by ORS 517.750. Any activities or
construction relating to such operations shall not be  a basis for an exception under ORS 197.732
(2)(a) or (b).
(i) One manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle,  or the temporary residential use of an
existing building, in conjunction with an existing dwelling as  a temporary use for the term of a
hardship suffered by the existing resident  or a relative of the resident. Within three months of the
end of  the hardship, the manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle shall be removed or demol-
ished or, in the case of an existing building,  the building shall be removed, demolished or returned
to an allowed nonresidential use. The governing body or its designee shall provide for periodic re-
view of the hardship  claimed under this paragraph. A temporary residence approved under this
paragraph is not eligible for replacement under paragraph (q) of this subsection.
(j) Climbing and passing lanes within the right of way existing as of July 1, 1987.
(k) Reconstruction or modification of  public roads and highways, including the placement of
utility facilities overhead and in the subsurface of public  roads and highways along the public right
of way, but not including the addition  of travel lanes, where no removal or displacement of buildings
would occur, or no new land parcels result.
(L) Temporary public road and  highway detours that will be abandoned and restored to original
condition or use at such time as no longer needed.
(m) Minor betterment  of existing public road and highway related facilities, such as maintenance
yards, weigh stations and rest areas, within right of  way existing as of July 1, 1987, and contiguous
public-owned property utilized to support the operation and maintenance of  public roads and high-
ways.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 3
(n) A replacement dwelling to be used in conjunction with farm use if  the existing dwelling has
been classified as historic property as described in ORS 358.487 (4).
(o) Creation, restoration or enhancement of wetlands.
(p) A winery, as described in ORS 215.452 or 215.453.
(q) Alteration,  restoration or replacement of a lawfully established dwelling, as described in ORS
215.291.
(r) Farm stands if:
(A) The structures are designed and used for the sale of farm crops or livestock grown  on the
farm operation, or grown on the farm operation and other farm operations in the  local agricultural
area, including the sale of retail incidental items and fee-based activity to promote the sale  of farm
crops or livestock sold at the farm stand if the annual sale of  incidental items and fees from pro-
motional activity do not make up more than 25 percent of the total annual sales of  the farm stand;
and
(B) The farm stand does not include structures designed for occupancy as a residence or  for
activity other than the sale of  farm crops or livestock and does not include structures for banquets,
public gatherings or public entertainment.
(s) An armed forces reserve center, if the  center is within one-half mile of a community college.
For purposes of this paragraph, “armed  forces reserve center” includes an armory or National
Guard support facility.
(t) A site for the takeoff and landing of model  aircraft, including such buildings or facilities as
may reasonably be necessary. Buildings or facilities shall not be more than 500 square feet in floor
area or placed on a permanent foundation  unless the building or facility preexisted the use approved
under this paragraph. The site shall not  include an aggregate surface or hard surface area unless
the surface  preexisted the use approved under this paragraph. An owner of property used for the
purpose authorized in this paragraph may charge a person operating  the use on the property rent
for the property.  An operator may charge users of the property a fee that does not exceed the
operator’s cost to maintain the property, buildings and facilities. As used in this paragraph, “model
aircraft” means a small-scale  version of an airplane, glider, helicopter, dirigible or balloon that is
used or intended to be used for flight and is controlled by radio, lines or design  by a person on the
ground.
(u) A facility for the processing of farm products as described in ORS 215.255.
(v) Fire service facilities providing rural fire protection services.
(w) Irrigation reservoirs, canals, delivery lines and  those structures and accessory operational
facilities, not including parks or other recreational structures and  facilities, associated with a dis-
trict as defined in ORS 540.505.
(x) Utility facility service lines. Utility facility service lines  are utility lines and accessory fa-
cilities or structures that  end at the point where the utility service is received by the customer and
that are located on one or more of the following:
(A) A public right of way;
(B) Land immediately adjacent to a public right of way, provided  the written consent of all ad-
jacent property owners has been obtained; or
(C) The property to be served by the utility.
(y) Subject to the issuance  of a license, permit or other approval by the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality under ORS 454.695, 459.205, 468B.050, 468B.053 or 468B.055, or in compliance with
rules adopted under ORS 468B.095, and as provided in ORS 215.246 to  215.251, the land application
of reclaimed water, agricultural or industrial  process water or biosolids, or the onsite treatment of
septage prior to the land  application of biosolids, for agricultural, horticultural or silvicultural
production, or for irrigation in connection with a use allowed in an  exclusive farm use zone under
this chapter. For the purposes of this paragraph, onsite treatment of  septage prior to the land ap-
plication of biosolids is limited to treatment using treatment  facilities that are portable, temporary
and transportable by truck trailer, as defined in ORS 801.580, during a period of time  within which
land application of biosolids is authorized under the license, permit or other approval.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 4
(z) Dog training classes or testing trials, which may  be conducted outdoors or in farm buildings
in existence on January 1, 2019, when:
(A) The number of dogs participating  in training does not exceed 10 dogs per training class and
the number of training classes to be held on-site does not exceed six per day; and
(B) The number of dogs participating in a testing trial does not exceed 60 and the number  of
testing trials to be conducted on-site is limited to four or fewer trials per calendar year.
(aa) A cider business, as described in ORS 215.451.
(bb) A farm brewery, as described in ORS 215.449.
(cc) A farm store, as described in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(2) In counties that have  adopted marginal lands provisions under ORS 197.247 (1991 Edition),
the following uses  may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use subject to ORS
215.296:
(a) A primary dwelling in conjunction with farm use or  the propagation or harvesting of a forest
product on a lot or parcel that is managed as part of a  farm operation or woodlot if the farm op-
eration or woodlot:
(A) Consists of 20 or more acres; and
(B) Is not smaller than the average farm or woodlot in the  county producing at least $2,500 in
annual gross income from the crops, livestock or forest products  to be raised on the farm operation
or woodlot.
(b) A primary dwelling in conjunction with farm use or  the propagation or harvesting of a forest
product on a lot or parcel that is managed as part of a farm  operation or woodlot smaller than re-
quired under paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the lot or parcel:
(A) Has  produced at least $20,000 in annual gross farm income in two consecutive calendar
years out of the three calendar years before the year in which the application  for the dwelling was
made or is planted in perennials capable of producing upon harvest an average of  at least $20,000
in annual gross farm income; or
(B) Is a woodlot capable  of producing an average over the growth cycle of $20,000 in gross an-
nual income.
(c) Commercial activities that are in conjunction with  farm use, including the processing of farm
crops into biofuel not permitted under ORS 215.203 (2)(b)(K) or 215.255.
(d) Operations conducted for:
(A) Mining and processing of geothermal resources as defined by ORS 522.005 and  oil and gas
as defined by ORS 520.005, not otherwise permitted under subsection (1)(g) of this section;
(B) Mining, crushing or stockpiling of aggregate and other mineral and other subsurface re-
sources subject to ORS 215.298;
(C) Processing, as defined by ORS 517.750, of aggregate into asphalt or portland cement; and
(D) Processing of other mineral resources and other subsurface resources.
(e) Community centers owned by a governmental agency or  a nonprofit community organization
and operated primarily by and for residents of the local rural community, hunting and  fishing pre-
serves, public and private parks,  playgrounds and campgrounds. Subject to the approval of the
county governing body or its designee, a private campground  may provide yurts for overnight
camping. No more than  one-third or a maximum of 10 campsites, whichever is smaller, may include
a yurt. The yurt shall  be located on the ground or on a wood floor with no permanent foundation.
Upon request of a county governing body, the Land  Conservation and Development Commission may
provide by rule for an increase in the number of yurts allowed  on all or a portion of the
campgrounds in a  county if the commission determines that the increase will comply with the
standards described in ORS  215.296 (1). A public park or campground may be established as provided
under ORS 195.120. As used in this paragraph, “yurt”  means a round, domed shelter of cloth or
canvas on a collapsible frame with no  plumbing, sewage disposal hookup or internal cooking appli-
ance.
(f) Golf courses on land determined not to be high-value farmland as defined in ORS 195.300.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 5
(g) Commercial utility facilities for the purpose  of generating power for public use by sale. If the
area zoned for exclusive farm use is  high-value farmland, a photovoltaic solar power generation fa-
cility may be established as a commercial utility facility as provided in  ORS 215.447. A renewable
energy facility as defined in ORS 215.446 may be established as a commercial utility facility.
(h) Personal-use airports for  airplanes and helicopter pads, including associated hangar, main-
tenance and service facilities.  A personal-use airport as used in this section means an airstrip re-
stricted, except for aircraft emergencies, to use by the owner, and, on an  infrequent and occasional
basis, by invited  guests, and by commercial aviation activities in connection with agricultural op-
erations. No aircraft may  be based on a personal-use airport other than those owned or controlled
by the owner of the airstrip. Exceptions  to the activities permitted under this definition may be
granted through waiver action by the Oregon Department  of Aviation in specific instances. A
personal-use airport lawfully existing as of September 13, 1975, shall continue to be permitted sub-
ject to any applicable rules of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(i) A facility for the primary processing of forest products, provided that such facility is found
to not seriously interfere with accepted farming practices and is  compatible with farm uses de-
scribed in ORS 215.203 (2). Such a facility may be approved for a  one-year period which is
renewable. These facilities are intended to be only portable  or temporary in nature. The primary
processing of a forest product, as used in this section,  means the use of a portable chipper or stud
mill or other similar methods  of initial treatment of a forest product in order to enable its shipment
to market. Forest products, as used in this section, means timber grown upon a parcel of land  or
contiguous land where the primary processing facility is located.
(j) A site for the disposal of solid waste approved by the governing body of a city or  county or
both and for which a permit  has been granted under ORS 459.245 by the Department of Environ-
mental Quality together with equipment, facilities or buildings necessary for its operation.
(k)(A) Commercial dog boarding kennels; or
(B) Dog training classes or testing trials that cannot be established under subsection  (1)(z) of
this section.
(L) Residential homes as defined in ORS 197.660, in existing dwellings.
(m) The propagation, cultivation,  maintenance and harvesting of aquatic species that are not
under the jurisdiction of the State Fish  and Wildlife Commission or insect species. Insect species
shall not  include any species under quarantine by the State Department of Agriculture or the United
States Department of Agriculture. The county shall provide notice of all applications under  this
paragraph to  the State Department of Agriculture. Notice shall be provided in accordance with the
county’s land use regulations but shall be  mailed at least 20 calendar days prior to any adminis-
trative decision or initial public hearing on the application.
(n) Home occupations as provided in ORS 215.448.
(o) Transmission towers over 200 feet in height.
(p) Construction of additional passing and travel lanes requiring the acquisition of right  of way
but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(q) Reconstruction or modification of public roads and highways involving the removal or dis-
placement of buildings but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(r) Improvement of public road and highway related facilities  such as maintenance yards, weigh
stations and rest areas, where additional property or right of way  is required but not resulting in
the creation of new land parcels.
(s) A destination resort that is approved consistent with the requirements of any statewide
planning goal relating to the siting of a destination resort.
(t) Room and board arrangements for  a maximum of five unrelated persons in existing resi-
dences.
(u) A living history museum related to resource based activities owned and  operated by a gov-
ernmental agency or  a local historical society, together with limited commercial activities and fa-
cilities that are directly related to the use and enjoyment of the museum and located  within
authentic buildings of the depicted historic period or  the museum administration building, if areas
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 6
other than an exclusive farm use zone cannot accommodate the museum and related activities or if
the museum administration buildings and parking lot are located within one quarter mile  of the
metropolitan urban growth boundary. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Living history museum”  means a facility designed to depict and interpret everyday life and
culture of some specific  historic period using authentic buildings, tools, equipment and people to
simulate past activities and events; and
(B) “Local historical society” means the local historical society, recognized  as such by the
county governing body and organized under ORS chapter 65.
(v) Operations for the extraction and bottling of water.
(w) An aerial fireworks display business that has  been in continuous operation at its current
location  within  an exclusive farm use zone since December 31, 1986, and possesses a wholesaler’s
permit to sell or provide fireworks.
(x) A landscape contracting business, as defined in ORS 671.520,  or a business providing land-
scape architecture services, as described in ORS 671.318, if the business  is pursued in conjunction
with the growing and marketing of nursery stock on the land that constitutes farm use.
(y) Public or private  schools for kindergarten through grade 12, including all buildings essential
to the  operation of a school, primarily for residents of the rural area in which the school is located.
(z) Equine and equine-affiliated therapeutic and counseling activities, provided:
(A) The activities  are conducted in existing buildings that were lawfully constructed on the
property before January 1, 2019, or in new buildings that are accessory, incidental and subordinate
to the farm use on the tract; and
(B) All individuals conducting therapeutic or counseling activities  are acting within the proper
scope of any licenses required by the state.
(aa) Child care  facilities, preschool recorded programs or school-age recorded programs that are:
(A) Authorized under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(B) Primarily for the children of residents and workers of the rural  area in which the facility
or program is located; and
(C) Colocated with a community center  or a public or private school allowed under this sub-
section.
(3) In counties that have adopted marginal lands provisions under  ORS 197.247 (1991 Edition),
a single-unit residential dwelling not provided in conjunction with farm use may  be established on
a lot or parcel  with soils predominantly in capability classes IV through VIII as determined by the
Agricultural Capability Classification System in use by the United States  Department of Agriculture
Soil Conservation Service on October 15, 1983. A proposed  dwelling is subject to approval of the
governing  body  or its designee in any area zoned for exclusive farm use upon written findings
showing all of the following:
(a) The dwelling or activities associated  with the dwelling will not force a significant change in
or significantly increase the cost of accepted farming practices  on nearby lands devoted to farm use.
(b) The dwelling  is situated upon generally unsuitable land for the production of farm crops and
livestock, considering the terrain, adverse  soil or land conditions, drainage and flooding, location
and size of the tract. A lot or parcel shall not be considered unsuitable solely because of  its size
or location if it can reasonably be put to farm use in conjunction with other land.
(c) Complies with such other  conditions as the governing body or its designee considers neces-
sary.
(4) In counties that have adopted marginal lands provisions under  ORS 197.247 (1991 Edition),
one single-unit dwelling, not provided in conjunction with farm use, may be established in any  area
zoned for  exclusive farm use on a lot or parcel described in subsection (7) of this section that is not
larger than three acres upon written findings showing:
(a) The dwelling or activities associated  with the dwelling will not force a significant change in
or significantly increase the cost of accepted farming practices  on nearby lands devoted to farm use;
(b) If the lot or parcel is located within the Willamette River Greenway, a floodplain or a
geological hazard area, the dwelling complies with conditions imposed by local  ordinances relating
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 7
specifically to the Willamette River Greenway, floodplains or geological hazard  areas, whichever is
applicable;  and
(c) The dwelling  complies with other conditions considered necessary by the governing body or
its designee.
(5) Upon  receipt of an application for a permit under subsection (4) of this section, the governing
body shall notify:
(a) Owners of land that is within 250  feet of the lot or parcel on which the dwelling will be
established; and
(b) Persons who have requested notice of such applications and who  have paid a reasonable fee
imposed by the county to cover the cost of such notice.
(6) The notice required in subsection (5)  of this section shall specify that persons have 15 days
following the date of postmark of  the notice to file a written objection on the grounds only that the
dwelling or activities associated with it would force a significant change in or significantly  increase
the cost of accepted farming practices on nearby lands devoted to farm use. If no objection is re-
ceived, the governing body or its  designee shall approve or disapprove the application. If an ob-
jection is received, the governing body shall set the matter for hearing  in the manner prescribed in
ORS 215.402 to 215.438. The governing body may  charge the reasonable costs of the notice required
by subsection (5)(a) of this section to the applicant for the permit requested under subsection (4) of
this section.
(7) Subsection (4) of this section applies to a lot  or parcel lawfully created between January 1,
1948, and July 1, 1983. For the purposes of this section:
(a) Only one lot or parcel exists if:
(A) A lot or parcel described in  this section is contiguous to one or more lots or parcels de-
scribed in this section; and
(B) On July 1, 1983, greater than possessory interests are held in  those contiguous lots, parcels
or lots and  parcels by the same person, spouses or a single partnership or business entity, separately
or in tenancy in common.
(b) “Contiguous” means lots, parcels or lots  and parcels that have a common boundary, includ-
ing but not limited to, lots, parcels or lots and parcels separated only by a public road.
(8) A person who sells or otherwise transfers real property in an exclusive farm use zone  may
retain a life estate in a  dwelling on that property and in a tract of land under and around the
dwelling.
(9) No final approval of a nonfarm use under  this section shall be given unless any additional
taxes imposed upon the change in use have been paid.
(10) Roads, highways and other transportation facilities and  improvements not allowed under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be established, subject to the approval of the  governing
body or its designee, in areas zoned for exclusive farm use subject to:
(a) Adoption of an exception to the goal related to agricultural lands and to any other applicable
goal with which the facility or improvement does not comply; or
(b) ORS 215.296 for those uses identified by rule of the  Land Conservation and Development
Commission as provided in section 3, chapter 529, Oregon Laws 1993.
(11) The following agri-tourism and other commercial events  or activities that are related to and
supportive of agriculture may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) A county may authorize a single agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity on a
tract in a calendar year by an authorization  that is personal to the applicant and is not transferred
by, or transferable with, a conveyance of the tract, if the agri-tourism or other  commercial event
or activity meets any local standards that apply and:
(A) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity is incidental and subordinate to ex-
isting farm use on the tract;
(B) The duration of the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity  does not exceed 72
consecutive hours;
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 8
(C) The  maximum attendance at the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity does not
exceed 500 people;
(D) The maximum number of motor vehicles parked at  the site of the agri-tourism or other
commercial event or activity does not exceed 250 vehicles;
(E) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity complies with ORS 215.296;
(F) The agri-tourism or other commercial  event or activity occurs outdoors, in temporary
structures, or in existing permitted structures, subject to health and  fire and life safety require-
ments; and
(G) The agri-tourism or other commercial event  or activity complies with conditions established
for:
(i) Planned hours of operation;
(ii) Access, egress and parking;
(iii) A traffic management plan that identifies the  projected number of vehicles and any antic-
ipated use of public roads; and
(iv) Sanitation and solid waste.
(b) In the  alternative to paragraphs (a) and (c) of this subsection, a county may authorize,
through an expedited, single-event license, a single agri-tourism  or other commercial event or ac-
tivity on a tract in a calendar year by an expedited, single-event license that is personal to the ap-
plicant and is not transferred by, or transferable with, a conveyance  of the tract. A decision
concerning an expedited, single-event license is not a  land use decision, as defined in ORS 197.015.
To approve an expedited, single-event license, the governing body of a  county or its designee must
determine that the proposed agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity meets any local
standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not begin before 6 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.;
(C) May not involve more than 100 attendees or 50 vehicles;
(D) May not include the artificial amplification of music or voices before 8 a.m. or after 8 p.m.;
(E) May not  require or involve the construction or use of a new permanent structure in con-
nection with the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity;
(F) Must be located on  a tract of at least 10 acres unless the owners or residents of adjoining
properties consent, in writing, to the location; and
(G) Must comply with applicable health and fire and life safety requirements.
(c) In the alternative to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a  county may authorize up to
six agri-tourism  or other commercial events or activities on a tract in a calendar year by a limited
use permit that is personal  to the applicant and is not transferred by, or transferable with, a
conveyance of the tract. The agri-tourism or other commercial events or  activities must meet any
local standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not, individually, exceed a duration of 72 consecutive hours;
(C) May not  require that a new permanent structure be built, used or occupied in connection
with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(D) Must comply with ORS 215.296;
(E) May not, in combination with other agri-tourism or other  commercial events or activities
authorized in the area, materially alter the stability of the land use pattern in the area; and
(F) Must comply with conditions established for:
(i) The types  of agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities that are authorized during
each calendar year, including the number  and duration of the agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities, the anticipated daily attendance and the hours of operation;
(ii) The location of existing structures and  the location of proposed temporary structures to be
used in connection with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(iii) The  location of access and egress and parking facilities to be used in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 9
(iv) Traffic management, including the projected number of vehicles  and any anticipated use of
public roads; and
(v) Sanitation and solid waste.
(d) In addition to paragraphs  (a) to (c) of this subsection, a county may authorize agri-tourism
or other commercial events or activities that occur more frequently or for a longer period or  that
do not otherwise comply with  paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection if the agri-tourism or other
commercial events or activities comply with any local standards that apply and  the agri-tourism or
other commercial events or activities:
(A) Are incidental and subordinate to existing  commercial farm use of the tract and are neces-
sary to support the commercial farm uses or the commercial agricultural enterprises in the area;
(B) Comply with the requirements of paragraph (c)(C), (D), (E) and (F) of this subsection;
(C) Occur on a lot or parcel that complies with the acknowledged minimum lot  or parcel size;
and
(D) Do not exceed 18 events or activities in a calendar year.
(12) A holder of a permit authorized by a county under  subsection (11)(d) of this section must
request review  of the permit at four-year intervals. Upon receipt of a request for review, the county
shall:
(a) Provide public notice and an opportunity for  public comment as part of the review process;
and
(b) Limit its review to events and activities authorized by the permit, conformance  with condi-
tions of approval required by the permit  and the standards established by subsection (11)(d) of this
section.
(13) For the purposes of subsection (11) of this section:
(a) A county may authorize the use of temporary  structures established in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities authorized under subsection (11) of this  sec-
tion. However, the  temporary structures must be removed at the end of the agri-tourism or other
event or activity. The county may not approve an alteration to the land  in connection with an
agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity authorized  under subsection (11) of this section,
including, but not limited to, grading, filling or paving.
(b) The county may issue the  limited use permits authorized by subsection (11)(c) of this section
for two calendar years. When considering an  application for renewal, the county shall ensure com-
pliance with the provisions of subsection (11)(c) of this section, any local standards  that apply and
conditions that apply to the permit or to the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities
authorized by the permit.
(c) The authorizations provided by subsection (11)  of this section are in addition to other au-
thorizations that may be provided by law, except that “outdoor mass gathering” and  “other gather-
ing,” as those terms are  used in ORS 197.015 (10)(d), do not include agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 215.283 is amended to read:
215.283. (1) The following uses may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) Churches and cemeteries in conjunction with churches.
(b) The propagation or harvesting of a forest product.
(c) Utility facilities necessary for public  service, not including commercial facilities for the
purpose of generating electrical power for public use by sale or transmission  towers over 200 feet
in height, but including:
(A) Utility facilities as provided in ORS 215.275;
(B) Utility facilities that are associated transmission lines, as defined in ORS  215.274 and
469.300;
(C) Wetland waste treatment systems; or
(D) Facilities and service lines needed to  provide water or wastewater services allowed under
ORS 215.256.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 10
(d) A dwelling on real property used for farm use if the dwelling is occupied by a  relative of the
farm operator or the farm  operator’s spouse, which means a child, parent, stepparent, grandchild,
grandparent, stepgrandparent, sibling, stepsibling, niece, nephew or first cousin of either,  if the farm
operator does or will require the assistance of the relative in  the management of the farm use and
the dwelling is located on the same lot or parcel as the dwelling of the farm  operator.
Notwithstanding ORS 92.010 to 92.192 or the minimum lot or parcel size requirements under ORS
215.780, if the owner  of a dwelling described in this paragraph obtains construction financing or
other financing secured by the dwelling and the secured party forecloses  on the dwelling, the se-
cured party may also foreclose on the homesite, as defined  in ORS 308A.250, and the foreclosure
shall operate as a partition of the homesite to create a new parcel.
(e) Subject to ORS 215.279, primary or accessory dwellings and  other buildings customarily
provided in conjunction with farm use.
(f) Operations for the exploration for and production of geothermal resources as defined by ORS
522.005 and oil and gas as defined by ORS 520.005, including the placement  and operation of
compressors, separators and other customary production equipment for an individual well adjacent
to the wellhead. Any activities or construction relating to such operations shall not be a  basis for
an exception under ORS 197.732 (2)(a) or (b).
(g) Operations  for the exploration for minerals as defined by ORS 517.750. Any activities or
construction relating to such operations shall not be  a basis for an exception under ORS 197.732
(2)(a) or (b).
(h) Climbing and passing lanes within the right of way existing as of July 1, 1987.
(i) Reconstruction or modification of public roads and highways, including the placement of
utility facilities overhead and in the subsurface of public  roads and highways along the public right
of way, but not including the addition  of travel lanes, where no removal or displacement of buildings
would occur, or no new land parcels result.
(j) Temporary  public road and highway detours that will be abandoned and restored to original
condition or use at such time as no longer needed.
(k) Minor betterment of existing  public road and highway related facilities such as maintenance
yards, weigh stations and rest areas, within right of  way existing as of July 1, 1987, and contiguous
public-owned property utilized to support the operation and maintenance of  public roads and high-
ways.
(L) A replacement dwelling to be used in conjunction with  farm use if the existing dwelling has
been classified as historic property as described in ORS 358.487 (4).
(m) Creation, restoration or enhancement of wetlands.
(n) A winery, as described in ORS 215.452 or 215.453.
(o) Farm stands if:
(A) The structures are designed and used for the sale of farm crops or livestock grown  on the
farm operation, or grown on the farm operation and other farm operations in the  local agricultural
area, including the sale of retail incidental items and fee-based activity to promote the sale  of farm
crops or livestock sold at the farm stand if the annual sale of  incidental items and fees from pro-
motional activity do not make up more than 25 percent of the total annual sales of  the farm stand;
and
(B) The farm stand does not include structures designed for occupancy as a residence or  for
activity other than the sale of  farm crops or livestock and does not include structures for banquets,
public gatherings or public entertainment.
(p) Alteration,  restoration or replacement of a lawfully established dwelling, as described in ORS
215.291.
(q) A site for the takeoff and landing of model aircraft, including such  buildings or facilities as
may reasonably be necessary. Buildings or facilities shall not be more than 500 square feet in floor
area or placed on a permanent foundation  unless the building or facility preexisted the use approved
under this paragraph. The site shall not include an aggregate  surface or hard surface area unless
the surface preexisted the use approved under this paragraph. An owner of property used for  the
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 11
purpose authorized in this paragraph may charge  a person operating the use on the property rent
for the property. An operator may charge users of the property a fee that does not  exceed the
operator’s cost to maintain the property, buildings and facilities. As used in this paragraph, “model
aircraft” means a small-scale version of an airplane, glider, helicopter, dirigible or  balloon that is
used or intended to be used for flight and is controlled by radio, lines or design  by a person on the
ground.
(r) A facility for the processing of farm products as described in ORS 215.255.
(s) Fire service facilities providing rural fire protection services.
(t) Irrigation reservoirs, canals, delivery  lines and those structures and accessory operational
facilities, not including parks or other  recreational structures and facilities, associated with a dis-
trict as defined in ORS 540.505.
(u) Utility facility service lines. Utility facility service  lines are utility lines and accessory fa-
cilities or structures that  end at the point where the utility service is received by the customer and
that are located on one or more of the following:
(A) A public right of way;
(B) Land immediately adjacent to a public  right of way, provided the written consent of all ad-
jacent property owners has been obtained; or
(C) The property to be served by the utility.
(v) Subject to the issuance of a license, permit or other approval by  the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality under ORS 454.695, 459.205, 468B.050, 468B.053 or 468B.055, or in compliance with
rules adopted under ORS 468B.095,  and as provided in ORS 215.246 to 215.251, the land application
of reclaimed water, agricultural or industrial process water or biosolids,  or the onsite treatment of
septage prior to the land application of biosolids, for  agricultural, horticultural or silvicultural
production, or for irrigation in connection  with a use allowed in an exclusive farm use zone under
this chapter. For the purposes of this  paragraph, onsite treatment of septage prior to the land ap-
plication of biosolids is limited to  treatment using treatment facilities that are portable, temporary
and transportable by  truck trailer, as defined in ORS 801.580, during a period of time within which
land application of biosolids is authorized under the license, permit or other approval.
(w) A county law enforcement facility that lawfully existed on August 20, 2002, and is used  to
provide rural law enforcement services  primarily in rural areas, including parole and post-prison
supervision, but not including a correctional facility as defined under ORS 162.135.
(x) Dog training classes  or testing trials, which may be conducted outdoors or in preexisting
farm buildings, when:
(A) The number of dogs participating  in training does not exceed 10 dogs per training class and
the number of training classes to be held on-site does not exceed six per day; and
(B) The number of dogs participating in a testing trial does not exceed 60 and the number  of
testing trials to be conducted on-site is limited to four or fewer trials per calendar year.
(y) A cider business, as described in ORS 215.451.
(z) A farm brewery, as described in ORS 215.449.
(aa) A farm store, as described in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(2) The following nonfarm uses may be  established, subject to the approval of the governing
body or its designee in any area zoned for exclusive farm use subject to ORS 215.296:
(a) Commercial activities that are in conjunction  with farm use, including the processing of farm
crops into biofuel not permitted under ORS 215.203 (2)(b)(K) or 215.255.
(b) Operations conducted for:
(A) Mining and processing  of geothermal resources as defined by ORS 522.005 and oil and gas
as defined by ORS 520.005 not otherwise permitted under subsection (1)(f) of this section;
(B) Mining, crushing or stockpiling of aggregate and other mineral and other subsurface re-
sources subject to ORS 215.298;
(C) Processing, as defined by ORS 517.750, of aggregate into asphalt or portland cement; and
(D) Processing of other mineral resources and other subsurface resources.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 12
(c) Private parks, playgrounds, hunting and fishing preserves  and campgrounds. Subject to the
approval of the county governing body or its designee, a private campground may  provide yurts for
overnight  camping.  No more than one-third or a maximum of 10 campsites, whichever is smaller,
may include a yurt. The yurt shall be located on the ground or on a wood floor with no  permanent
foundation. Upon request of a  county governing body, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission may provide by rule for an increase in the number of yurts allowed on all  or a portion
of the campgrounds in a county if the commission determines that the increase will comply with  the
standards described in ORS  215.296 (1). As used in this paragraph, “yurt” means a round, domed
shelter of cloth or canvas on a collapsible frame with no plumbing,  sewage disposal hookup or
internal cooking appliance.
(d) Parks and playgrounds. A public park may be established consistent  with the provisions of
ORS 195.120.
(e) Community centers owned by a governmental agency or  a nonprofit community organization
and operated primarily by and for residents of the local rural community. A community center au-
thorized under  this paragraph may provide services to veterans, including but not limited to emer-
gency  and  transitional shelter, preparation and service of meals, vocational and educational
counseling and referral to local, state or federal agencies providing  medical, mental health, disabil-
ity income replacement  and substance abuse services, only in a facility that is in existence on Jan-
uary 1, 2006. The services may not include direct delivery of medical,  mental health, disability
income replacement or substance abuse services.
(f) Golf courses on land:
(A) Determined not to be high-value farmland, as defined in ORS 195.300 (10); or
(B) Determined to be high-value farmland described in ORS 195.300 (10)(c) if the land:
(i) Is not otherwise described in ORS 195.300 (10);
(ii) Is surrounded on all sides by an approved golf course; and
(iii) Is west of U.S. Highway 101.
(g) Commercial utility facilities for the purpose  of generating power for public use by sale. If the
area zoned for exclusive farm use is  high-value farmland, a photovoltaic solar power generation fa-
cility may be established as a commercial utility facility as provided in  ORS 215.447. A renewable
energy facility as defined in ORS 215.446 may be established as a commercial utility facility.
(h) Personal-use airports for  airplanes and helicopter pads, including associated hangar, main-
tenance and service facilities. A  personal-use airport, as used in this section, means an airstrip re-
stricted, except for aircraft emergencies, to use by the owner, and, on an  infrequent and occasional
basis, by invited  guests, and by commercial aviation activities in connection with agricultural op-
erations. No aircraft may  be based on a personal-use airport other than those owned or controlled
by the owner of the airstrip. Exceptions  to the activities permitted under this definition may be
granted through waiver action by the Oregon Department  of Aviation in specific instances. A
personal-use airport lawfully existing as of September 13, 1975, shall continue to be permitted sub-
ject to any applicable rules of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(i) Home occupations as provided in ORS 215.448.
(j) A facility for the primary processing of forest products, provided that such facility is found
to not seriously interfere with accepted farming practices and is  compatible with farm uses de-
scribed in ORS 215.203 (2). Such a facility may be approved for a  one-year period which is
renewable. These facilities are intended to be only portable  or temporary in nature. The primary
processing of a forest product, as used in this section,  means the use of a portable chipper or stud
mill or other similar methods  of initial treatment of a forest product in order to enable its shipment
to market. Forest products, as used in this section, means timber grown upon a parcel of land  or
contiguous land where the primary processing facility is located.
(k) A site for the disposal of solid waste approved by the governing body  of a city or county or
both and for which a permit has been granted under ORS 459.245  by the Department of Environ-
mental Quality together with equipment, facilities or buildings necessary for its operation.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 13
(L) One manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle, or the temporary  residential use of an
existing building, in conjunction with an existing dwelling as  a temporary use for the term of a
hardship suffered by the existing resident or a relative of the resident.  Within three months of the
end of the hardship, the manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle shall be removed or  demol-
ished or, in the case of an existing building,  the building shall be removed, demolished or returned
to an allowed nonresidential use. The governing body or its designee shall provide for periodic re-
view of the hardship claimed under this paragraph. A temporary residence  approved under this
paragraph is not eligible for replacement under subsection (1)(p) of this section.
(m) Transmission towers over 200 feet in height.
(n)(A) Commercial dog boarding kennels; or
(B) Dog  training classes or testing trials that cannot be established under subsection (1)(x) of
this section.
(o) Residential homes as defined in ORS 197.660, in existing dwellings.
(p) The propagation, cultivation, maintenance and harvesting of aquatic species that are  not
under the jurisdiction of the State Fish  and Wildlife Commission or insect species. Insect species
shall not  include any species under quarantine by the State Department of Agriculture or the United
States Department of Agriculture. The county shall provide notice of all applications under  this
paragraph to  the State Department of Agriculture. Notice shall be provided in accordance with the
county’s land use regulations but shall be  mailed at least 20 calendar days prior to any adminis-
trative decision or initial public hearing on the application.
(q) Construction of additional passing and travel lanes requiring the acquisition of right  of way
but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(r) Reconstruction or modification  of public roads and highways involving the removal or dis-
placement of buildings but not resulting in the creation of new land parcels.
(s) Improvement of public road and highway related facilities, such as maintenance yards, weigh
stations and rest areas, where additional property or right of way  is required but not resulting in
the creation of new land parcels.
(t) A destination  resort that is approved consistent with the requirements of any statewide
planning goal relating to the siting of a destination resort.
(u) Room and board arrangements for a maximum of five unrelated persons  in existing resi-
dences.
(v) Operations for the extraction and bottling of water.
(w) Expansion of existing county fairgrounds and  activities directly relating to county
fairgrounds governed by county fair boards established pursuant to ORS 565.210.
(x) A living history  museum related to resource based activities owned and operated by a gov-
ernmental agency or a local historical society, together with limited commercial activities  and fa-
cilities  that  are directly related to the use and enjoyment of the museum and located within
authentic buildings of the depicted historic period  or the museum administration building, if areas
other than an exclusive farm use zone cannot accommodate the museum and related activities or if
the museum administration buildings  and parking lot are located within one quarter mile of an ur-
ban growth boundary. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Living history museum”  means a facility designed to depict and interpret everyday life and
culture of some specific  historic period using authentic buildings, tools, equipment and people to
simulate past activities and events; and
(B) “Local historical society” means the local historical society recognized  by the county gov-
erning body and organized under ORS chapter 65.
(y) An aerial fireworks display business that has been in continuous operation at its current
location  within  an exclusive farm use zone since December 31, 1986, and possesses a wholesaler’s
permit to sell or provide fireworks.
(z) A landscape contracting business, as defined in ORS 671.520, or a business  providing land-
scape architecture services, as described in ORS 671.318, if the business  is pursued in conjunction
with the growing and marketing of nursery stock on the land that constitutes farm use.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 14
(aa) Public  or private schools for kindergarten through grade 12, including all buildings essen-
tial to the operation of a school, primarily  for residents of the rural area in which the school is
located.
(bb) Equine and equine-affiliated therapeutic and counseling activities, provided:
(A) The activities  are conducted in existing buildings that were lawfully constructed on the
property before January 1, 2019, or in new buildings that are accessory, incidental and subordinate
to the farm use on the tract; and
(B) All individuals conducting therapeutic or counseling activities  are acting within the proper
scope of any licenses required by the state.
(cc) Guest ranches in eastern Oregon, as described in ORS 215.461.
(dd) Child care  facilities, preschool recorded programs or school-age recorded programs that are:
(A) Authorized under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(B) Primarily for the children of residents and workers of the rural  area in which the facility
or program is located; and
(C) Colocated with a community center  or a public or private school allowed under this sub-
section.
(3) Roads, highways and other transportation facilities and improvements not  allowed under
subsections  (1) and (2) of this section may be established, subject to the approval of the governing
body or its designee, in areas zoned for exclusive farm use subject to:
(a) Adoption of an exception to the goal related to agricultural lands and to any other applicable
goal with which the facility or improvement does not comply; or
(b) ORS 215.296 for those  uses identified by rule of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission as provided in section 3, chapter 529, Oregon Laws 1993.
(4) The following agri-tourism and other commercial events or activities  that are related to and
supportive of agriculture may be established in any area zoned for exclusive farm use:
(a) A county may authorize a single agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity on a
tract in a calendar year by an authorization  that is personal to the applicant and is not transferred
by, or transferable  with, a conveyance of the tract, if the agri-tourism or other commercial event
or activity meets any local standards that apply and:
(A) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity is incidental and subordinate to ex-
isting farm use on the tract;
(B) The duration of the  agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity does not exceed 72
consecutive  hours;
(C) The  maximum attendance at the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity does not
exceed 500 people;
(D) The maximum number of motor vehicles parked  at the site of the agri-tourism or other
commercial event or activity does not exceed 250 vehicles;
(E) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity complies with ORS 215.296;
(F) The agri-tourism or other commercial event or  activity occurs outdoors, in temporary
structures, or in existing permitted structures,  subject to health and fire and life safety require-
ments; and
(G) The agri-tourism or other commercial event  or activity complies with conditions established
for:
(i) Planned hours of operation;
(ii) Access, egress and parking;
(iii) A traffic management plan that identifies the  projected number of vehicles and any antic-
ipated use of public roads; and
(iv) Sanitation and solid waste.
(b) In the alternative to paragraphs (a) and (c) of this subsection, a county  may authorize,
through an expedited, single-event license, a single  agri-tourism or other commercial event or ac-
tivity on a tract in a calendar year by an expedited, single-event license that is personal to the ap-
plicant and is not transferred by,  or transferable with, a conveyance of the tract. A decision
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 15
concerning an expedited, single-event license is not a land  use decision, as defined in ORS 197.015.
To approve an expedited, single-event license,  the governing body of a county or its designee must
determine that the proposed agri-tourism  or other commercial event or activity meets any local
standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not begin before 6 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.;
(C) May not involve more than 100 attendees or 50 vehicles;
(D) May not include the artificial amplification of music or voices before 8 a.m. or after 8 p.m.;
(E) May not  require or involve the construction or use of a new permanent structure in con-
nection with the agri-tourism or other commercial event or activity;
(F) Must be located on  a tract of at least 10 acres unless the owners or residents of adjoining
properties consent, in writing, to the location; and
(G) Must comply with applicable health and fire and life safety requirements.
(c) In the alternative to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a  county may authorize up to
six agri-tourism  or other commercial events or activities on a tract in a calendar year by a limited
use permit that is personal  to the applicant and is not transferred by, or transferable with, a
conveyance of the tract. The agri-tourism or other commercial events or  activities must meet any
local standards that apply, and the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities:
(A) Must be incidental and subordinate to existing farm use on the tract;
(B) May not, individually, exceed a duration of 72 consecutive hours;
(C) May not  require that a new permanent structure be built, used or occupied in connection
with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(D) Must comply with ORS 215.296;
(E) May not, in combination with other agri-tourism or other  commercial events or activities
authorized in the area, materially alter the stability of the land use pattern in the area; and
(F) Must comply with conditions established for:
(i) The types  of agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities that are authorized during
each calendar year, including the number  and duration of the agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities, the anticipated daily attendance and the hours of operation;
(ii) The location of existing structures and  the location of proposed temporary structures to be
used in connection with the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(iii) The  location of access and egress and parking facilities to be used in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities;
(iv) Traffic management, including the projected number of vehicles  and any anticipated use of
public roads; and
(v) Sanitation and solid waste.
(d) In addition to paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection, a  county may authorize agri-tourism
or other  commercial events or activities that occur more frequently or for a longer period or that
do not otherwise comply with paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection if  the agri-tourism or other
commercial events or activities  comply with any local standards that apply and the agri-tourism or
other commercial events or activities:
(A) Are incidental and subordinate to existing commercial farm use  of the tract and are neces-
sary to support the commercial farm uses or the commercial agricultural enterprises in the area;
(B) Comply with the requirements of paragraph (c)(C), (D), (E) and (F) of this subsection;
(C) Occur on a  lot or parcel that complies with the acknowledged minimum lot or parcel size;
and
(D) Do not exceed 18 events or activities in a calendar year.
(5) A holder of a permit authorized by a county under  subsection (4)(d) of this section must re-
quest review of the permit at four-year intervals. Upon receipt of a request for review, the  county
shall:
(a) Provide public notice and an opportunity for  public comment as part of the review process;
and
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 16
(b) Limit its review to events and activities authorized by the permit, conformance  with condi-
tions of approval required by the  permit and the standards established by subsection (4)(d) of this
section.
(6) For the purposes of subsection (4) of this section:
(a) A county may authorize the use of temporary  structures established in connection with the
agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities authorized under subsection (4) of this  section.
However, the temporary structures must be removed at the end of the agri-tourism  or other event
or activity. The county  may not approve an alteration to the land in connection with an agri-tourism
or other commercial event or activity authorized under subsection (4) of this  section, including, but
not limited to, grading, filling or paving.
(b) The county may issue the limited  use permits authorized by subsection (4)(c) of this section
for two calendar years. When considering an  application for renewal, the county shall ensure com-
pliance with the provisions of subsection (4)(c) of this section, any local standards that  apply and
conditions that apply to the permit or to the agri-tourism or other commercial events or activities
authorized by the permit.
(c) The authorizations provided by subsection (4) of  this section are in addition to other au-
thorizations that may be provided by law, except that “outdoor mass gathering” and  “other gather-
ing,” as those terms are  used in ORS 197.015 (10)(d), do not include agri-tourism or other commercial
events and activities.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475A.570 is amended to read:
475A.570. [ Psilocybin-producing fungi as crop; exceptions to permitted uses. ] (1) Psilocybin-
producing fungi is:
(a) A crop for the purposes of farm use as defined in ORS 215.203;
(b) A crop for purposes of a farm and farming practice, both as defined in ORS 30.930;
(c) A product of farm use as described in ORS 308A.062; and
(d) The product of an agricultural activity for purposes of ORS 568.909.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS chapters  195, 196, 197, 197A, 215 and 227, the following are not per-
mitted uses on land designated for exclusive farm use:
(a) A new dwelling used in conjunction with a psilocybin-producing fungi crop;
(b) A farm stand, as described  in ORS 215.213 (1)(r) or 215.283 (1)(o), used in conjunction with
a psilocybin-producing fungi crop; [ and]
(c) A farm store, as described in section 2 of this 2026 Act, used in conjunction with a
psilocybin-producing fungi crop; and
[(c)] (d)  Subject to subsection (3)  of this section, a commercial activity, as described in ORS
215.213 (2)(c) or 215.283 (2)(a), carried on in conjunction with a psilocybin-producing fungi crop.
(3) The operation of a psilocybin  service center may be carried on in conjunction with a
psilocybin-producing fungi crop.
(4) A county may allow the manufacture of psilocybin products as a farm use  on land zoned for
farm or forest use in the same manner as the manufacture of psilocybin products is allowed in  ex-
clusive farm use zones under this section and ORS 215.213, 215.283 and 475C.053.
(5) This section applies to psilocybin product manufacturers that hold a license  under ORS
475A.290.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475C.489 is amended to read:
475C.489. (1) Marijuana is:
(a) A crop for the purposes of “farm use” as defined in ORS 215.203;
(b) A crop for purposes of a “farm” and “farming practice,” both as defined in ORS 30.930;
(c) A product of farm use as described in ORS 308A.062; and
(d) The product of an agricultural activity for purposes of ORS 568.909.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS chapters 195, 196, 197, 197A, 215 and 227, the following  are not per-
mitted uses on land designated for exclusive farm use:
(a) A new dwelling used in conjunction with a marijuana crop;
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 17
(b) A farm stand, as described in ORS 215.213 (1)(r) or 215.283  (1)(o), used in conjunction with
a marijuana crop; [ and]
(c) A farm store, as described in section 2 of this 2026 Act, used in conjunction with a
marijuana crop; and
[(c)] (d) A  commercial activity, as described in ORS 215.213 (2)(c) or 215.283 (2)(a), carried on
in conjunction with a marijuana crop.
(3) A county may allow the production of marijuana as a farm use on land zoned for farm or
forest use in the same manner as the production of marijuana is  allowed in exclusive farm use zones
under this section and ORS 215.213, 215.283 and 475C.053.
(4) This section applies to:
(a) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065;
(b) Persons registered under ORS 475C.792 and designated to produce marijuana by one  or more
persons who hold valid registry identification cards issued under ORS 475C.783; and
(c) For the purpose of producing  marijuana or propagating immature marijuana plants, re-
searchers of cannabis that hold a certificate issued under ORS 475C.289.
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 18